Utah statutes.
16-17-208.   Change of name, address, or type of organization by commercial registered agent.

(1)  If a commercial registered agent changes its name, its address as currently listed under Subsection 16-17-204(1), or its type or jurisdiction of organization, the agent shall file with the division a statement of change signed by or on behalf of the agent which states:

(a)  the name of the agent as currently listed under Subsection 16-17-204(1);

(b)  if the name of the agent has changed, its new name;

(c)  if the address of the agent has changed, the new address; and

(d)  if the type or jurisdiction of organization of the agent has changed, the new type or jurisdiction of organization.

(2)  The filing of a statement of change under Subsection (1) is effective to change the information regarding the commercial registered agent with respect to each entity represented by the agent.

(3)  A statement of change filed under this section takes effect on filing.

(4)  A commercial registered agent shall promptly furnish each entity represented by it with notice in a record of the filing of a statement of change relating to the name or address of the agent and the changes made by the filing.

(5)  If a commercial registered agent changes its address without filing a statement of change as required by this section, the division may cancel the listing of the agent under Section 16-17-204.  A cancellation under this Subsection (5) has the same effect as a termination under Section 16-17-205.  Promptly after canceling the listing of an agent, the division shall serve notice in a record in the manner provided in Subsection 16-17-301(2) or (3) on:

(a)  each entity represented by the agent, stating that the agent has ceased to be an agent for service of process on the entity and that, until the entity appoints a new registered agent, service of process may be made on the entity as provided in Section 16-17-301; and

(b)  the agent, stating that the listing of the agent has been canceled under this section.



Enacted by Chapter 364, 2008 General Session

